Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 89. Postsecondary Review Entity

§ 2881.
Vermont Higher Education Council; designation.

The Vermont Higher Education Council is hereby designated as the Vermont state postsecondary review entity for the purpose of reviewing all institutions of higher education that are eligible or which desire to become eligible for funding under 42 U.S.C. Chapter 34, Subchapter I, Part C (work study programs) or 20 U.S.C. Chapter 28, Subchapter IV (student assistance).

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2882.
Vermont state postsecondary review entity; powers and duties.

The Vermont state postsecondary review entity shall review institutions of higher education in accordance with standards established in

20 U.S.C. § 1099a

-3 and with standards established by the Vermont state postsecondary review entity with the agreement of the federal Department of Education.

The Vermont state postsecondary review entity may enter into agreements with the Secretary of the Federal Department of Education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. Chapter 28, Subchapter IV, Part G.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.